Tennessee, session 114, HB2500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503(a)(7)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(i) A governmental entity shall not require a written request to view a public
record unless otherwise required by law. Requests to view public records may be
submitted in person or by telephone, fax, mail, or email if the governmental entity uses
such means of communication to transact official business, or via internet portal if the
governmental entity maintains an internet portal that is used for accepting public records
requests.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503(a)(5), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(5) Information made confidential by state law shall be redacted whenever
possible, and the redacted record shall be made available for inspection and copying.
The redaction of confidential information shall not constitute the creation of a new
record. Costs associated with redacting records, including the cost of copies and staff
time to provide redacted copies, shall be borne by the requestor seeking to inspect or
receive copies of records that require redaction.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503(a)(7)(B)(i), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
HB2500
012564
- 1 -

(i) A records custodian may require a requestor to pay the custodian's
reasonable costs incurred in producing the requested material for inspection and the
reasonable costs of copies of such requested material. The reasonable costs must be
assessed in the manner established by the office of open records counsel pursuant to §
8-4-604.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-4-604(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
A schedule of reasonable charges that a records custodian may use as a
guideline to charge a citizen requesting to inspect or make copies of public records
pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012564